Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2262.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 8-15,106 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
15,106. (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a micro utility
truck: (1) on any interstate highway, or federal highway or state highway;
or (2) on any public highway or street within the corporate limits of any
city unless authorized by such city.
(b) No micro utility truck shall be operated on any public highway or
street, unless such truck complies with the equipment requirements under
article 17 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments
theretoA person may operate a micro utility truck on any state or public
highway or street under the following conditions:
(1) The micro utility truck shall be properly registered under article 1
of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto;
(2) the micro utility truck shall comply with the equipment
requirements under article 17 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto; and
(3) the micro utility truck shall only be operated on a state or public
highway with a posted maximum speed limit of 65 miles per hour or less.
(c) The provisions of subsection (a), shall not prohibit a micro utility
truck from crossing a federal or state highway.
(d) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the uniform act
regulating traffic on highways.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 8-15,106 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.